North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-16 Community Youth Council

50-16-01.
Community youth council authorized.

A community youth council may be established in any city or township in this state. Such a council may be initiated by:

The mayor of any city or by the president of the board of city commissioners;

The chairman of the board of supervisors of any township; or

The superintendent or principal of the schools of any municipality or community.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 307, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 50-1601; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 233.

50-16-02.
Additional members — How appointed.

Any officer initiating the community youth council shall appoint as additional members thereof representatives of the local government, the churches, the American legion, and of all service or women’s clubs, or welfare organizations in the community. All members of the council shall serve without compensation.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 307, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 50-1602.

50-16-03.
Duties of community youth council.

The community youth council shall perform the following duties:

Make a survey of the youth of the community.

Coordinate the leisure activities provided for them by the various organizations of the community.

Provide the place, method, and means for useful, supervised activities for those out of school, out of work, and without an opportunity for proper development.

Provide for the class mentioned in subsection 3 a healthful outlet for its energies and love of adventure.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 307, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 50-1603.

50-16-04.
Bringing council into existence — Organization.

The initiating officer shall call the council into being on the petition of any organization, or of five residents of the community, or on the initiating officer’s own motion. The council shall organize by the selection of a chairman and a secretary and by the adoption of such rules and regulations for future meetings and activities as it may deem desirable for the purpose of carrying out the objects of this chapter. Three members are sufficient to organize the council and constitute a quorum.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 307, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 50-1604.